dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="d/arsa__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>arsa</l><r>arsa<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ries</l><r>arsa<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/amra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>amra</l><r>amra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mamar</l><r>amra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/israħ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>israħ</l><r>israħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sieraħ</l><r>israħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/int__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>int</l><r>int<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niet</l><r>int<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/ejtuni__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ejtuni</l><r>ejtuni<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wieten</l><r>ejtuni<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/alqa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>alqa</l><r>alqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>elieqi</l><r>alqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n/ewl__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ewl</l><r>ewl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiel</l><r>ewl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/eżżula__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>eżżula</l><r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>żieżel</l><r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bet/but__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>but</l><r>but<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>btie</l><r>but<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ixkilla__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ixkilla</l><r>ixkilla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>xiekel</l><r>ixkilla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/iżar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iżar</l><r>iżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ożor</l><r>iżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/urżieqa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urżieqa</l><r>urżieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieżaq</l><r>urżieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/arbuna__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arbuna</l><r>arbuna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raben</l><r>arbuna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="qol/la__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>la</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ol</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/eqer__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>eqer</l><r>eqer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iqra</l><r>eqer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/urżar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urżar</l><r>urżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rażar</l><r>urżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/ens__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ens</l><r>ens<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nus</l><r>ens<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/iħa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iħa</l><r>iħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wejjaħ</l><r>iħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/oħħ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>oħħ</l><r>oħħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħuħ</l><r>oħħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z/alza__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>alza</l><r>alza<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lazi</l><r>alza<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/exxun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>exxun</l><r>exxun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>xaxen</l><r>exxun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>xiexen</l><r>exxun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/uġġieġa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>uġġieġa</l><r>uġġieġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ġejjeġ</l><r>uġġieġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/abra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>abra</l><r>abra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>babar</l><r>abra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/ażiż__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ażiż</l><r>ażiż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eżież</l><r>ażiż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ekruna__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ekruna</l><r>ekruna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kieren</l><r>ekruna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċap/pa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>pa</l><r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ap</l><r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ep</l><r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="xof/fa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>fa</l><r>fa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>of</l><r>fa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="xk/ora__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ora</l><r>ora<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjer</l><r>ora<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ined__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ined</l><r>ined<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nied</l><r>ined<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niedi</l><r>ined<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/urkett__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urkett</l><r>urkett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieket</l><r>urkett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/effa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>effa</l><r>effa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fief</l><r>effa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/erq__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>erq</l><r>erq<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ruq</l><r>erq<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/alba__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>alba</l><r>alba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lub</l><r>alba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lan/ċa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ċa</l><r>ċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eċ</l><r>ċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/erduq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erduq</l><r>erduq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riedaq</l><r>erduq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/arkun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arkun</l><r>arkun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raken</l><r>arkun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/umnija__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>umnija</l><r>umnija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mieni</l><r>umnija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/artoċċ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>artoċċ</l><r>artoċċ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rataċ</l><r>artoċċ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/ewka__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ewka</l><r>ewka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiek</l><r>ewka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="seqer"><i>s</i><par n="s/eqer__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="liżar"><i>l</i><par n="l/iżar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għalqa"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/alqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="riħa"><i>r</i><par n="r/iħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bixkilla"><i>b</i><par n="b/ixkilla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dabra"><i>d</i><par n="d/abra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="beżżula"><i>b</i><par n="b/eżżula__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għażiż"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/ażiż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bolla"><i>bol</i><par n="qol/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sined"><i>s</i><par n="s/ined__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="zalza"><i>z</i><par n="z/alza__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="misraħ"><i>m</i><par n="m/israħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kamra"><i>k</i><par n="k/amra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċens"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/ens__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bint"><i>b</i><par n="b/int__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="niċċa"><i>niċ</i><par n="lan/ċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pexxun"><i>p</i><par n="k/exxun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kurkett"><i>k</i><par n="k/urkett__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="molla"><i>mol</i><par n="qol/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skartoċċ"><i>sk</i><par n="k/artoċċ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="folla"><i>fol</i><par n="qol/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="moffa"><i>mof</i><par n="xof/fa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xoffa"><i>xof</i><par n="xof/fa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċumnija"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/umnija__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħuġġieġa"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/uġġieġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="antikamra"><i>antik</i><par n="k/amra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qalba"><i>q</i><par n="q/alba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żurżar"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/urżar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żejtuni"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/ejtuni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="keffa"><i>k</i><par n="k/effa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kartoċċ"><i>k</i><par n="k/artoċċ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xkora"><i>xk</i><par n="xk/ora__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċappa"><i>ċap</i><par n="ċap/pa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lanċa"><i>lan</i><par n="lan/ċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="newl"><i>n</i><par n="n/ewl__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="miċċa"><i>miċ</i><par n="lan/ċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="barkun"><i>b</i><par n="b/arkun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġens"><i>ġ</i><par n="ċ/ens__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="darsa"><i>d</i><par n="d/arsa__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żurżieqa"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/urżieqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="moħħ"><i>m</i><par n="m/oħħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fekruna"><i>f</i><par n="f/ekruna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċurkett"><i>ċ</i><par n="k/urkett__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="betbut"><i>bet</i><par n="bet/but__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żarbuna"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/arbuna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serduq"><i>s</i><par n="s/erduq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qolla"><i>qol</i><par n="qol/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ferq"><i>f</i><par n="f/erq__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="perċa"><i>per</i><par n="lan/ċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xewka"><i>x</i><par n="x/ewka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kexxun"><i>k</i><par n="k/exxun__n_GD"/></e>
